Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.090

Tortious conduct of state—Liability for damages.

The state of Washington, whether acting in its governmental or proprietary capacity, shall be liable for damages arising out of its tortious conduct to the same extent as if it were a private person or corporation.

[ 1963 c 159 s 2; 1961 c 136 s 1.]